Massachusetts, session 194th, S2077.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any other general of special law to the contrary, the Commonwealth
hereby directs the Executive Office of Housing and Liveable Communities starting in the year
2025 to promulgate regulations to require any new construction or major rehabilitation
development project that receives Low Income Housing Tax Credit (LIHTC) funding to earn
green building certification. For the purpose of this provision, “green building certification” shall
mean third-party certification, at appropriate certification levels, under the U.S. Green Building
Council’s LEED (Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design) green building rating
system, and other systems determined by the Department, in consultation with the Department of
Energy Resources, to be equally rigorous to LEED with respect to energy efficiency, indoor
environmental quality, and relevant climate mitigation practices such as commissioning and
waste reduction.
of 2

The Executive Office of Housing and Liveable Communities is directed to amend its
Qualified Allocation Plan (QAP) to reflect the requirements of this section and promulgate as
such. The Department is further directed to analyze and make publicly available, from time to
time, post-occupancy analysis of energy and water efficiency of LIHTC-funded housing, and to
provide information to potential LIHTC applicants about available incentives and other support
for energy efficiency.
of 2